Utah statutes.
26-4-22.   Additional powers and duties of department.
The department may:
(1)  establish rules to carry out the provisions of this chapter;
(2)  arrange for the state health laboratory to perform toxicologic analysis
for public or private institutions and fix fees for the services;
(3)  cooperate and train law enforcement personnel in the techniques of
criminal investigation as related to medical and pathological matters; and
(4)  pay to private parties, institutions or funeral directors the reasonable
value of services performed for the medical examiner's office.
